Oklahoma, session 2025, SB205.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 427.19a of Title 63, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The Oklahoma Medical Marijuana Authority shall be authorized


to create a research license to facilitate the collection, analysis,


and monitoring of patient-reported outcomes related to the use of


medical marijuana.


B. Licensees may evaluate medical marijuana products available


in this state to analyze patient-reported outcomes. Licensees may


allow eligible entities to conduct studies including, but not


limited to, surveys and data collection to analyze the impact of


medical marijuana on medical conditions.

Req. No. 1173 Page 1


C. Entities eligible for a license pursuant to this section


shall be:


1. Research institutions;


2. Health care organizations;


3. Licensed cannabis businesses; and


4. Private research companies.


D. The initial, nonrefundable fee for a patient-reported


outcome research license shall be Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00).


E. The Authority shall promulgate rules related to the issuance


of licenses, application approvals, compliance monitoring, and


reporting requirements.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1173 CAD 12/30/2024 3:52:05 PM





















Req. No. 1173 Page 2